Vermont, session 2025-2026, H880.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 4913 is amended to read:
§ 4913. REPORTING CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT; REMEDIAL
ACTION
* * *
(i) Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, a A person may not
refuse to make a report required by this section on the grounds that making the
report would violate a privilege or disclose a confidential communication.
(j) A member of the clergy shall not be required to make a report under this
section if the report would be based upon information received in a
communication that is:
(1) made to a member of the clergy acting in his or her capacity as
spiritual advisor;
(2) intended by the parties to be confidential at the time the
communication is made;
(3) intended by the communicant to be an act of contrition or a matter of
conscience; and
(4) required to be confidential by religious law, doctrine, or tenet.
[Repealed.]
(k) When a member of the clergy receives information about abuse or
neglect of a child in a manner other than as described in subsection (j) of this
VT LEG #385423 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.880
2026 Page 3 of 3
section, he or she is required to report on the basis of that information even
though he or she may have also received a report of abuse or neglect about the
same person or incident in the manner described in subsection (j) of this
section. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385423 v.1